test/src/gt-norm-yamls/M-all_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - assii ok: # Noun 'sak'
     assii+N+Sg+Nom: assii
     assii+N+Sg+Gen: assiin
     assii+N+Sg+Par: assiita
     assii+N+Sg+Tra: assiiksi
     assii+N+Sg+Abe: assiitta
     assii+N+Sg+Ine: assiissa
     assii+N+Sg+Ela: assiista
     assii+N+Sg+Ill: assiisseen
     assii+N+Sg+Ade: assiila
     assii+N+Sg+Abl: assiilta
     assii+N+Sg+All: assiile
     assii+N+Sg+Ess: assiina
     assii+N+Pl+Nom: assiit
     assii+N+Pl+Gen: assiitten
     assii+N+Pl+Par: assiita
     assii+N+Pl+Tra: assiiksi
     assii+N+Pl+Abe: assiitta
     assii+N+Pl+Ine: assiissa
     assii+N+Pl+Ela: assiista
     assii+N+Pl+Ill: assiissiin
     assii+N+Pl+Ade: assiila
     assii+N+Pl+Abl: assiilta
     assii+N+Pl+All: assiile
     assii+N+Pl+Ess: assiina
     assii+N+Pl+Com: assiine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - elläin - ok : # Noun 'animal' - ok
     elläin+N+Sg+Nom: elläin
     elläin+N+Sg+Gen: elläimen
     elläin+N+Sg+Par: elläintä
     elläin+N+Sg+Tra: elläimeksi
     elläin+N+Sg+Abe: elläimettä
     elläin+N+Sg+Ine: elläimessä
     elläin+N+Sg+Ela: elläimestä
     elläin+N+Sg+Ill: elläimheen
     elläin+N+Sg+Ade: elläimellä
     elläin+N+Sg+Abl: elläimeltä
     elläin+N+Sg+All: elläimelle
     elläin+N+Sg+Ess: elläimennä
     elläin+N+Pl+Nom: elläimet
     elläin+N+Pl+Gen: elläimiitten
     elläin+N+Pl+Par: elläimiitä
     elläin+N+Pl+Tra: elläimiksi
     elläin+N+Pl+Abe: elläimittä
     elläin+N+Pl+Ine: elläimissä
     elläin+N+Pl+Ela: elläimistä
     elläin+N+Pl+Ill: elläimhiin
     elläin+N+Pl+Ade: elläimillä
     elläin+N+Pl+Abl: elläimiltä
     elläin+N+Pl+All: elläimille
     elläin+N+Pl+Com: elläimine
     elläin+N+Pl+Ess: elläiminnä


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - hirsi - ok : # Noun 'år' - ei tsekattu
     hirsi+N+Sg+Nom: hirsi
     hirsi+N+Sg+Gen: hirren
     hirsi+N+Sg+Par: hirttä
     hirsi+N+Sg+Tra: hirreksi
     hirsi+N+Sg+Abe: hirrettä
     hirsi+N+Sg+Ine: hirressä
     hirsi+N+Sg+Ela: hirrestä
     hirsi+N+Sg+Ill: hirtheen
     hirsi+N+Sg+Ade: hirrelä
     hirsi+N+Sg+Abl: hirreltä
     hirsi+N+Sg+All: hirrele
     hirsi+N+Sg+Ess: hirtenä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Nom: hirret
     hirsi+N+Pl+Gen: hirssiin
     hirsi+N+Pl+Par: hirssii
     hirsi+N+Pl+Tra: hirsiksi
     hirsi+N+Pl+Abe: hirsittä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Ine: hirsissä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Ela: hirsistä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Ill: hirshiin
     hirsi+N+Pl+Ade: hirsilä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Abl: hirsiltä
     hirsi+N+Pl+All: hirsile
     hirsi+N+Pl+Ess: hirsinä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Com: hirsine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - hoppee - ok : # Noun 'borg' - 
     hoppee+N+Sg+Nom: hoppee
     hoppee+N+Sg+Gen: hoppeen
     hoppee+N+Sg+Par: hoppeeta
     hoppee+N+Sg+Tra: hoppeeksi
     hoppee+N+Sg+Abe: hoppeetta
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ine: hoppeessa
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ela: hoppeesta
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ill: hoppeesseen
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ade: hoppeela
     hoppee+N+Sg+Abl: hoppeelta
     hoppee+N+Sg+All: hoppeele
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ess: hoppeena
     hoppee+N+Pl+Nom: hoppeet
     hoppee+N+Pl+Gen: hoppeitten
     hoppee+N+Pl+Par: hoppeita
     hoppee+N+Pl+Tra: hoppeiksi
     hoppee+N+Pl+Abe: hoppeitta
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ine: hoppeissa
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ela: hoppeista
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ill: hoppeissiin
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ade: hoppeila
     hoppee+N+Pl+Abl: hoppeilta
     hoppee+N+Pl+All: hoppeile
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ess: hoppeina
     hoppee+N+Pl+Com: hoppeine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - housut - ok : # Noun 'tid' - ei tsekattu
     housut+N+Pl+Nom: housut
     housut+N+Pl+Gen: housuitten
     housut+N+Pl+Par: housui
     housut+N+Pl+Tra: housuiksi
     housut+N+Pl+Abe: housuitta
     housut+N+Pl+Ine: housuissa
     housut+N+Pl+Ela: housuista
     housut+N+Pl+Ill: houshuin
     housut+N+Pl+Ade: housuila
     housut+N+Pl+Abl: housuilta
     housut+N+Pl+All: housuile
     housut+N+Pl+Ess: housuina
     housut+N+Pl+Com: housuine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - huonet - ok : # Noun 'rom' - ok
     huonet+N+Sg+Nom: huonet
     huonet+N+Sg+Gen: huonheen
     huonet+N+Sg+Par: huonetta
     huonet+N+Sg+Tra: huonheeksi
     huonet+N+Sg+Abe: huonheetta
     huonet+N+Sg+Ine: huonheessa
     huonet+N+Sg+Ela: huonheesta
     huonet+N+Sg+Ill: huonheesseen
     huonet+N+Sg+Ade: huonheela
     huonet+N+Sg+Abl: huonheelta
     huonet+N+Sg+All: huonheele
     huonet+N+Sg+Ess: huonheena
     huonet+N+Pl+Nom: huonheet
     huonet+N+Pl+Gen: huonheitten
     huonet+N+Pl+Par: huonheita
     huonet+N+Pl+Tra: huonheiksi
     huonet+N+Pl+Abe: huonheitta
     huonet+N+Pl+Ine: huonheissa
     huonet+N+Pl+Ela: huonheista
     huonet+N+Pl+Ill: huonheissiin
     huonet+N+Pl+Ade: huonheila
     huonet+N+Pl+Abl: huonheilta
     huonet+N+Pl+All: huonheile
     huonet+N+Pl+Ess: huonheina
     huonet+N+Pl+Com: huonheine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - hyljet - ok : # Noun 'borg' - ok
     hyljet+N+Sg+Nom: hyljet
     hyljet+N+Sg+Gen: hylkheen
     hyljet+N+Sg+Par: hyljettä
     hyljet+N+Sg+Tra: hylkheeksi
     hyljet+N+Sg+Abe: hylkheettä
     hyljet+N+Sg+Ine: hylkheessä
     hyljet+N+Sg+Ela: hylkheestä
     hyljet+N+Sg+Ill: hylkheesseen
     hyljet+N+Sg+Ade: hylkheelä
     hyljet+N+Sg+Abl: hylkheeltä
     hyljet+N+Sg+All: hylkheele
     hyljet+N+Sg+Ess: hylkheenä
     hyljet+N+Pl+Nom: hylkheet
     hyljet+N+Pl+Gen: hylkheitten
     hyljet+N+Pl+Par: hylkheitä
     hyljet+N+Pl+Tra: hylkheiksi
     hyljet+N+Pl+Abe: hylkheittä
     hyljet+N+Pl+Ine: hylkheissä
     hyljet+N+Pl+Ela: hylkheistä
     hyljet+N+Pl+Ill: hylkheissiin
     hyljet+N+Pl+Ade: hylkheilä
     hyljet+N+Pl+Abl: hylkheiltä
     hyljet+N+Pl+All: hylkheile
     hyljet+N+Pl+Ess: hylkheinä
     hyljet+N+Pl+Com: hylkheine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ihminen - ok : # Noun 'menneske' - ok
     ihminen+N+Sg+Nom: ihminen
     ihminen+N+Sg+Gen: ihmisen
     ihminen+N+Sg+Par: ihmistä
     ihminen+N+Sg+Tra: ihmiseksi
     ihminen+N+Sg+Abe: ihmisettä
     ihminen+N+Sg+Ine: ihmisessä
     ihminen+N+Sg+Ela: ihmisestä
     ihminen+N+Sg+Ill: ihmisheen
     ihminen+N+Sg+Ade: ihmisellä
     ihminen+N+Sg+Abl: ihmiseltä
     ihminen+N+Sg+All: ihmiselle
     ihminen+N+Sg+Ess: ihmisennä
     ihminen+N+Pl+Nom: ihmiset
     ihminen+N+Pl+Gen: ihmisten
     ihminen+N+Pl+Par: ihmissii
     ihminen+N+Pl+Tra: ihmisiksi
     ihminen+N+Pl+Abe: ihmisittä
     ihminen+N+Pl+Ine: ihmisissä
     ihminen+N+Pl+Ela: ihmisistä
     ihminen+N+Pl+Ill: ihmishiin
     ihminen+N+Pl+Ade: ihmisillä
     ihminen+N+Pl+Abl: ihmisiltä
     ihminen+N+Pl+All: ihmisille
     ihminen+N+Pl+Ess: ihmisinnä
     ihminen+N+Pl+Com: ihmisine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - joki - ok : # Noun 'borg' - ok
     joki+N+Sg+Nom: joki
     joki+N+Sg+Gen: joven
     joki+N+Sg+Par: jokkee
     joki+N+Sg+Tra: joveksi
     joki+N+Sg+Abe: jovetta
     joki+N+Sg+Ine: jovessa
     joki+N+Sg+Ela: jovesta
     joki+N+Sg+Ill: jokheen
     joki+N+Sg+Ade: jovela
     joki+N+Sg+Abl: jovelta
     joki+N+Sg+All: jovele
     joki+N+Sg+Ess: jokena
     joki+N+Pl+Nom: jovet
     joki+N+Pl+Gen: jokkiin
     joki+N+Pl+Par: jokkii
     joki+N+Pl+Tra: joviksi
     joki+N+Pl+Abe: jovitta
     joki+N+Pl+Ine: jovissa
     joki+N+Pl+Ela: jovista
     joki+N+Pl+Ill: jokhiin
     joki+N+Pl+Ade: jovila
     joki+N+Pl+Abl: jovilta
     joki+N+Pl+All: jovile
     joki+N+Pl+Ess: jokina
     joki+N+Pl+Com: jokine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - linna - ok : # Noun 'borg' - ok
     kainulainen+N+Sg+Nom: kainulainen
     kainulainen+N+Sg+Gen: kainulaisen
     kainulainen+N+Sg+Par: kainulaista
     kainulainen+N+Sg+Tra: kainulaiseksi
     kainulainen+N+Sg+Abe: kainulaisetta
     kainulainen+N+Sg+Ine: kainulaisessa
     kainulainen+N+Sg+Ela: kainulaisesta
     kainulainen+N+Sg+Ill: kainulaisheen
     kainulainen+N+Sg+Ade: kainulaisela
     kainulainen+N+Sg+Abl: kainulaiselta
     kainulainen+N+Sg+All: kainulaisele
     kainulainen+N+Sg+Ess: kainulaisena
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Nom: kainulaiset
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Gen: kainulaisten
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Par: kainulaissii
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Tra: kainulaisiksi
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Abe: kainulaisitta
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Ine: kainulaisissa
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Ela: kainulaisista
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Ill: kainulaishiin
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Ade: kainulaisila
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Abl: kainulaisilta
     kainulainen+N+Pl+All: kainulaisile
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Ess: kainulaisina
     kainulainen+N+Pl+Com: kainulaisine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kajava: # Noun 'seagull' - ei tsekattu
     kajava+N+Sg+Nom: kajava
     kajava+N+Sg+Gen: kajavan
     kajava+N+Sg+Par: kajavaa
     kajava+N+Sg+Tra: kajavaksi
     kajava+N+Sg+Abe: kajavatta
     kajava+N+Sg+Ine: kajavassa
     kajava+N+Sg+Ela: kajavasta
     kajava+N+Sg+Ill: kajavhaan
     kajava+N+Sg+Ade: kajavalla
     kajava+N+Sg+Abl: kajavalta
     kajava+N+Sg+All: kajavalle
     kajava+N+Sg+Ess: kajavanna
     kajava+N+Pl+Nom: kajavat
     kajava+N+Pl+Gen: kajaviitten
     kajava+N+Pl+Gen: kajavitten
     kajava+N+Pl+Par: kajaviita
     kajava+N+Pl+Tra: kajaviksi
     kajava+N+Pl+Abe: kajavitta
     kajava+N+Pl+Ine: kajavissa
     kajava+N+Pl+Ela: kajavista
     kajava+N+Pl+Ill: kajavhiin
     kajava+N+Pl+Ade: kajavilla
     kajava+N+Pl+Abl: kajavilta
     kajava+N+Pl+All: kajaville
     kajava+N+Pl+Ess: kajavina
     kajava+N+Pl+Com: kajavine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - karamelli - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     karamelli+N+Sg+Nom: karamelli
     karamelli+N+Sg+Gen: karamellin
     karamelli+N+Sg+Par: karamellii
     karamelli+N+Sg+Tra: karamelliksi
     karamelli+N+Sg+Abe: karamellitta
     karamelli+N+Sg+Ine: karamellissa
     karamelli+N+Sg+Ela: karamellista
     karamelli+N+Sg+Ill: karamellhiin
     karamelli+N+Sg+Ade: karamellila
     karamelli+N+Sg+Abl: karamellilta
     karamelli+N+Sg+All: karamellile
     karamelli+N+Sg+Ess: karamellina
     karamelli+N+Pl+Nom: karamellit
     karamelli+N+Pl+Gen: karamelliitten
     karamelli+N+Pl+Par: karamelliita
     karamelli+N+Pl+Tra: karamelliiksi
     karamelli+N+Pl+Abe: karamelliitta
     karamelli+N+Pl+Ine: karamelliissa
     karamelli+N+Pl+Ela: karamelliista
     karamelli+N+Pl+Ill: karamellhiin
     karamelli+N+Pl+Ade: karamelliila
     karamelli+N+Pl+Abl: karamelliilta
     karamelli+N+Pl+All: karamelliile
     karamelli+N+Pl+Ess: karamelliina
     karamelli+N+Pl+Com: karamelliine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - käsi - ok : # Noun 'år' - ei tsekattu
     käsi+N+Sg+Nom: käsi
     käsi+N+Sg+Gen: käđen
     käsi+N+Sg+Par: kättä
     käsi+N+Sg+Tra: käđeksi
     käsi+N+Sg+Abe: käđettä
     käsi+N+Sg+Ine: käđessä
     käsi+N+Sg+Ela: käđestä
     käsi+N+Sg+Ill: kätheen
     käsi+N+Sg+Ade: käđelä
     käsi+N+Sg+Abl: käđeltä
     käsi+N+Sg+All: käđele
     käsi+N+Sg+Ess: kätenä
     käsi+N+Pl+Nom: käđet
     käsi+N+Pl+Gen: kässiin
     käsi+N+Pl+Par: kässii
     käsi+N+Pl+Tra: käsiksi
     käsi+N+Pl+Abe: käsittä
     käsi+N+Pl+Ine: käsissä
     käsi+N+Pl+Ela: käsistä
     käsi+N+Pl+Ill: käshiin
     käsi+N+Pl+Ade: käsilä
     käsi+N+Pl+Abl: käsiltä
     käsi+N+Pl+All: käsile
     käsi+N+Pl+Ess: käsinä
     käsi+N+Pl+Com: käsine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
